Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Peace Corps

154.1-700.
Definitions for KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745.

As used in KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Allowance” means a twice-monthly payment granted volunteers during the term of their service. For the purposes of KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745, an allowance shall not be considered a salary or a wage.

“Board” means the Kentucky Peace Corps Governing Board created by KRS 154.1-705.

“Community/user” means the nonprofit entity or entities for which a task is being performed by a volunteer or volunteers.

“Corps” means Kentucky Peace Corps created by KRS 154.1-715.

“Director” means the chief administrative officer of the corps appointed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 154.1-715.

“Employee” means “employee” as defined by KRS 18A.005.

“Volunteer” means Kentucky Peace Corps volunteers selected pursuant to the provisions of KRS 154.1-710.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-705.
Kentucky Peace Corps Governing Board.

There shall be created by KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745 the Kentucky Peace Corps Governing Board consisting of nine (9) members appointed by the Governor to staggered terms not to exceed four (4) years. Three (3) of these appointees shall be from 501c charitable corporations; one (1) shall represent local government; one (1) shall represent labor; one (1) shall represent the business community; and three (3) shall be employed by state agencies performing work related to the corps’ purposes.

At least one (1) member of the board appointed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be from each congressional district. No more than two (2) members shall be from the same congressional district.

The board shall annually elect one (1) of its members chairman and one (1) of its members vice chairman.

The board shall meet at such time and place as shall be specified by the call of its chairman. At least one (1) meeting shall be held each month.

All meetings of the board shall be open to the public as provided in KRS 61.810 to 61.850.

At least seven (7) days in advance of each regular meeting of the board, notice shall be given in writing to each member by the director, which shall include, at the least, a tentative agenda. Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall keep records and minutes of its business and official actions.

All records of the board shall be public records and open to public inspection as provided in KRS 61.872 to 61.884.

Board members shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 44 and 45 and KRS 18A.200 for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as prescribed by KRS 154.1-710 and 154.1-715.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-710.
Duties of board.

Subject to the provisions of KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745, and KRS Chapter 13A, it shall be the duty of the board to:

Promulgate administrative regulations to establish a selection process for:

Volunteers which shall include, but not be limited to, the testing of applicants for emotional stability by a mental health professional licensed in Kentucky for independent practice;

Projects to be undertaken and completed by volunteers and a method of applying for these projects. The specific purpose or goal of the corps outlined in KRS 154.1-720 shall be taken into consideration when applying this methodology.

Initial administrative regulations promulgated under the provisions of KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745 shall be filed with the Legislative Research Commission within ninety (90) days of July 14, 1992.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-715.
Additional duties of board.

Among its other duties, the board shall also be required to:

Govern, or exercise authority, over the corps;

Appoint a director to function as chief administrative officer of the corps;

Make annual reports to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission, and biennial reports to the Kentucky General Assembly;

Advise the Governor and the director with respect to projects assigned to and undertaken by the corps;

Consider and act on any and all matters referred to it by the director; and

Investigate any irregularities reported by the public.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-720.
Kentucky Peace Corps — Purpose — Director.

A Kentucky Peace Corps, headed by a director appointed by the board created by KRS 154.1-705, is hereby created.

The purpose of the corps is to:

Create a volunteer, domestic service corps to promote a mechanism for selfless service for those who wish to improve the lives of other Kentuckians, raise the standard of living, enhance self actualization, and create a more conducive environment for future generations of Kentuckians.

Assist the Commonwealth of Kentucky through targeted activities which promote the public good and achieve measurable or visible improvement in the environment, public service, individual productivity, education, health, and humanitarian endeavors.

Identify and utilize the skills, knowledge, and expertise of dedicated, well-trained volunteers who have met stringent selection criteria and have effectively demonstrated their commitment to the Kentucky Peace Corps.

Promote a cross-fertilization of ideas, skills, and concepts.

The director, authorized by subsection (1) of this section, shall be a graduate of an accredited college or university and have at least five (5) years’ experience in administration or in related fields. Additional education may be substituted for the required experience on a year-to-year basis. Additional experience may be substituted for the required education on a year-to-year basis, provided the experience level is deemed appropriate by the board.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-725.
Duties of director.

It shall be the duty of the director to:

Serve as chief administrative officer to the corps and secretary to the board, and to provide whatever help and technical assistance as deemed necessary by the board to the board.

Hire, as provided in the budget enacted by the Kentucky General Assembly and other state and federal laws applicable to state personnel, whatever employees are deemed necessary by the board to carry out the provisions of KRS 154.1-700 to 154.1-745, provided the number of employees does not exceed twelve (12).

Prepare the budget request for approval by the board in the form and manner required by applicable state law. For the purposes of KRS Chapter 48, the board and the corps shall be considered a budget unit.

Develop a handbook for volunteers for submission to and approval of the board prior to printing and distribution.

Develop a handbook for community/users for submission to and approval of the board prior to printing and distribution.

Prepare program status reports on a monthly basis.

The director, on behalf of the corps, and with the permission of the board, may join or subscribe to any association or service having as its purpose the interchange of information relating to the improvement of the corps, or volunteer organizations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-730.
Salaries of director and employees — Unclassified status of employees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 64.610 through 64.470, the salaries of the director and other employees of the corps, shall be determined by order of the board, provided these salaries do not exceed the limitations established by the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and limitations established by the Executive Budget enacted by the Kentucky General Assembly.

All employees of the corps, including its director, shall be deemed unclassified employees of the Executive Department, covered by the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A relating to unclassified employees.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-735.
Qualifications, benefits, and requirements for volunteers.

Volunteers shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age.

Volunteers shall not serve within a seventy-five mile radius of their legal or voting residence.

Volunteers shall not be considered employees of the board or the Commonwealth of Kentucky; however, they shall be granted:

An allowance which, at a minimum, shall equal the federal minimum wage;

Appeal rights pursuant to the provisions of KRS 154.1-740;

Relocation benefits;

Health benefits;

Social security benefits;

Free tuition for one full-time semester at a state-supported Kentucky college or university for every twelve (12) months’ service completed in the corps; and

Workers’ compensation.

Volunteers may receive reimbursement for travel, provided the reimbursement does not exceed the limitations established for Executive Department employees either by law or administrative regulation.

Notwithstanding other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, volunteers shall not be eligible to receive:

Dental benefits;

Disability insurance;

Life insurance;

Reimbursement for meals; or

Unemployment insurance.

All volunteers shall be expected to bring with them a minimum amount of tools to perform their tasks, but the community/user is expected to supply all other items, exclusive of clothing and other personal hygiene and grooming items.

Volunteers shall agree in writing to:

Cooperate with corps personnel with whom he is working in their common effort, and to abide by the policies and procedures set forth in the handbook and administrative regulations required by KRS 154.1-710, and other applicable state and federal laws.

Hold the Kentucky Peace Corps harmless and to release it from any and all claims arising out of or in connection with any agreement he signs upon volunteering, excepting only that the corps shall remain liable for any harm directly attributable to its gross negligence.

Perform the work assigned to him in an acceptable manner to the corps, or its representatives.

Not engage in any regular work which carries monetary compensation and which falls outside the scope of the assigned corps duties. Any exceptions to this provision shall be authorized in writing by the director, and approved by the board.

Serve the number of months, not to exceed two (2) years, deemed appropriate by the board and director to complete the task assigned. The board may extend the volunteer’s contract an additional two (2) years, provided the volunteer is willing, and provided the volunteer has a special skill or expertise needed by the corps. Conversely, the board may reduce the number of months of the contract in the event of hardship.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-740.
Discipline of volunteers.

Volunteers shall be disciplined or dismissed for cause only.

In the event any volunteer is disciplined or dismissed for cause, he may appeal, within thirty (30) days, to Franklin Circuit Court for reinstatement.

If reinstatement is ordered by the Franklin Circuit Court, the volunteer shall be returned to his job immediately and made whole, provided the order is not appealed to a higher court.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

154.1-745.
Purchase of retirement credit by volunteers.

Volunteers who become contributing members of any state administered retirement system may purchase service credit for time served in the corps as provided in KRS 61.552 and 161.515.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 100, § 10, effective July 14, 1992.